About Wysa and Our Contact Details
What Information We Collect and Use
How We Use Your Information
How We Protect Your Information
Who We Share Information With
Sharing Information Outside Your Country
Your Data Protection Rights
How To Complain
Supplementary Privacy Notices
Changes To This Policy
Change Log
Wysa Privacy Policy
Initial Effective Date: June 30, 2017(GMT)
Latest Revised Date:  October 1, 2024 (GMT)
Version: 6.0.0
Read about our Use of Generative AI privacy policy
here
Our privacy policy explains what we do with your provided information when you use our website or web pages (
wysa.com
), web-based or mobile-based app software (“app”) and its services.
You may try out one or more services made available to you. These include:
A text or voice-based digital coach powered by an Artificial Intelligence chatbot (“AI Coach”).
Clinically verified tools delivered over text or voice (“Digital tools”).
Text or audio-video chats with a human mental health and well-being expert (“Wysa Coach”).
Text or audio-video chats with a Chronic Care Management professional (“Wysa Medical Assistant”).
Use our Digital Front Door and get access to different Institutional services (“e-triage”).
Use the AI Coach powered by Generative AI (“Wysa+”).
The app is made to help you feel happier by showing you ways to take care of your mental health and well-being. The app does not tell you if you have a disease or condition, or how to treat it. The app gives general advice for your mental health and well-being. The AI Coach is an AI technology powered software, not a real person, so it can only help in restricted ways. It does not give medical advice. If you need medical advice, it will suggest seeing a local clinician. It cannot give specific advice for complex health problems.
We will work with your public institution, healthcare institution, educational institution or other organization to offer our services. These are called Institutional services. Before you can use these services, you will need to agree to our rules and the rules of your Institution.
By using our website, web pages, app and services, you agree that we can use your information as described in this privacy policy and any other related policies. If you use our Wysa+ service, then the Wysa+ privacy policy will also apply to you.
Content
About Wysa and Our Contact Details
What Information We Collect and Use
How We Use Your Information
How We Protect Your Information
Who We Share Information With
Sharing Information Outside Your Country
Your Data Protection Rights
How To Complain
Supplementary Privacy Notices
Changes To This Policy
Changes Log
1. About Wysa and Our Contact Details :
Touchkin eServices Pvt. Ltd. (“Wysa”) are the makers of the Wysa app and its services. Wysa is a company with offices in the UK, India, and the USA. The app and services are available in native english. Select services are available in Spanish and in certain languages of India.
Where Wysa decides the purpose of personal data processing, we will be the “data controller or data fiduciary”. Where we perform personal data processing at the direction of your Institution, we will be “data processors”.
If you have any questions, comments, complaints, or requests about our app and services, you can email us at
wysa@wysa.io
.
2. What Information We Collect and Use
When you use our app and services.
When you use the AI Coach, digital tools, Wysa Coach or Wysa Medical Assistant services, we collect the following information. You control the information you share with us. We design our app to collect as little personal data as possible to keep your data safe and protect your privacy. This means there is less risk of your information being misused. When you share information with us, we are responsible for taking care of it.
Information provided by you.
Information about you.
This includes things like your nickname, age-range, gender, pronouns, or identifiers you may voluntarily reveal about yourself. Contact information shared with Wysa Coach or Wysa Medical Assistant or as required for your Institution.
Conversation data.
This covers what you type in messages, your challenges, preferences, feelings, moods, thoughts, task lists, and safety information. It also includes answers to surveys or questionnaires from us or your Institution, and how you use our tools we offer. This includes everything you type in messages or say in voice or video calls with your Wysa Coach or Wysa Medical Assistant.
Correspondence data.
If you email us, you might share personal data like your name, email address, home address, the company you are part of, your job title, and what you talk about in the message.
Feedback data.
When we ask for your thoughts on our app and services, we gather your contact info and some basic details about you.
Information collected via automated means or by third parties.
Information from your Institution
. Sometimes, your Institutions or their appointed representatives might share or ask you to share your personal data with the app, like your contact details, so we can offer you our services.
App event data.
We collect information about what you do in the app, like where you tap, what actions you take, your settings, notifications you get, and the screens you visit.
Device data.
When you install the app, we get an ID for your device from the Google Play Store. We also collect information about your device, like the type of phone, its time zone, and its operating system. A service provider that helps us deliver content might also get your IP address to provide our services.
Cookie Information.
We and our third-party providers collect information about your app use via cookies or similar technologies. We use mandatory or necessary cookies to provide our services.
When you use the Digital Front Door (e-triage) Service
The service helps your Institution guide you and your dependents to the right care and support. The following additional Information gets used.
Information from your Institution.
. You can use the service by logging in through your Institution’s Single Sign-On (SSO) web page. This means you can use your usual Institution login details to access the e-triage service. The first time you use the e-triage service, it will take you to your Institution's login page to verify your identity. Wysa does not collect and use your personal login details. Instead, Wysa gets a unique, encrypted code to create a random identifier for you.
Information about you.
This may include but not limited to pronouns, country, service group.
When you use the AI Coach over WhatsApp.
Where, you directly use the AI Coach on WhatsApp, the focus is on helping you sleep better. The service does not give medical advice and always suggests seeing a doctor if needed. Wysa will not use your WhatsApp messages to send you marketing material. We do collect and use the additional information to provide you with our service.
Information about you.
This may include but not limited to your mobile number, whatsapp profile name, city, interests, language.
Where your Institution provides access to the AI Coach on WhatsApp, they do not give us any of your personal information. They only share a unique identifier to help us connect with your Institution systems and offer our AI Coach service to you. This unique identifier cannot be used to identify you.
When you use the Chronic Care Management Service.
When you use this service, you or your healthcare provider may additionally share protected health information with our app and with our Wysa Medical Assistants. These may include a patient referral form that contains your name, your current or past medication details, your clinical assessments and evaluation details. We will process this information on behalf of your Institution to provide the Chronic Care Management service.
When you participate in a Wysa research study.
You can choose to sign up and join any of our online studies. When you volunteer, we will collect some information from you. These include:
Information about you.
. This may include but not limited to your contact details, country, gender, socio-economic details, age-range.
Health and Wellness data.
This may include but not limited to ethnicity, alcohol/substance use concerns, use of medication, any mental disorder diagnosis or treatment, about hallucination, validated assessment responses.
When you visit our website or social media accounts or our web pages.
When you visit our website or web pages or just reach out to us for business purposes, we will collect the following information from you.
Correspondence data:
. If you contact us, you might share personal data like your name, email address, home address, the company you are part of, your job title, business contact details and what you talk about in the message.
Cookie Information.
We and our third-party providers collect information about your website use via cookies or similar technologies. Information could include but not limited to browser type, browser language, operating System, language settings, web page views and the link clicks, campaign clicks, IP address.
You can follow us on Instagram through the Wysa app settings. If you do not have an Instagram account, you can create one and follow us at @wysa_buddy. Your Instagram account will not be linked to your Wysa app account. We will know your personal information when you interact with us on our social media channels.
When you use the Wysa+ Service
Wysa+ provides an improved experience of the AI Coach service. It allows us to provide you with high-quality, safe, and clinically-approved content. Wysa+ uses third-party Generative AI and our own AI to chat with you. This helps the AI Coach talk about varied conversations and provide responses that are more suited to you. Where provided, Wysa+ allows you to chat in native English and specific Indian languages. Your conversation data is processed to provide this service. Every piece of content generated by the AI passes through our safety and quality checks before we use it. Our clinical staff review these content to make sure they are safe, private, high-quality, and work well. We only release features that have been validated. For more details, please read the
Wysa+ Terms of Use
and the
Wysa+ Privacy Policy
.
When you participate in online group well-being sessions.
We may collect limited personal information such as your name and contact details, When you participate in group wellness sessions or webinars conducted by our Wysa Coach or Wysa staff.
When you participate in our campaigns or promotions or marketing events.
Any promotions, campaigns, or surveys you participate in will not be connected to your app account. Instead, this information will be stored securely in our Google Workspace or marketing tool accounts. We may collect and process the following information as part of these promotions.
Promotion event data:
If you participate in our promotional activities, we may collect your name and contact details.
We may put ads online to see how many people are interested in our service or to promote it. We use only trusted ad managers. We do not collect any personal information when you see or click on our ads.
When you apply for a role at Wysa
We may process personal information you may provide us when you apply for an open position or attend our hiring interviews.
Recruitment data:
This may  include but not limited to your name, contact details, resume, references, credentials, transcripts, government provided identification, compensation information, race or ethnic origin, opinions and beliefs, physical or mental health or condition, sexual orientation.
Sources of personal data
We get your personal data either from you or your Institution.
3. How We Use Your Information
Legal grounds
We need to follow data protection laws that make sure we look after your personal data properly. Here is how and why we might use it:
Consent:
Sometimes, we ask you if it is okay to use your personal data. You can always change your mind later if you decide you do not want us to use it anymore by writing to us
Contract Performance:
When you use our app or services, we might need some of your personal data to provide our services and make sure everything works properly.
Legitimate Interests:
We or someone we trust, might use your personal data to keep our services safe from fraud or security problems. We might also use it to make our services better.
Legal Obligation:
Sometimes, we need to use your personal data to follow the law or to protect our company and the people who provide the services.
Sometimes, we need to use sensitive data that you share, like how you feel, your mood, or other things about your emotional health. We will only do this if we follow the law and have a good reason, such as:
Helping you with advice or support or keeping you safe while you use our app and services.
Acting on behalf of your Institution to redirect you to care resources.
Uses of your Information
We might use the information you give us on our app and services for these reasons.
Information about you
To provide and manage app and services:
Here is what we do with your information:
To recognize you as a direct or Institution, new or existing user to the app and service.
When needed, we will ask for your permission to turn on your device's microphone and camera.
We collect, move, save, and use your provided information to make our services work.
We set up and keep track of your chats and use of our services.
We let you change your nickname.
If needed, we will connect with your Institution's approved systems to handle your information.
If your Institution offers the Wysa Coach service, we will connect you with a human mental health and well-being professional.
If your Institution offers the Wysa Medical Assistant service, we will connect you with a human Chronic Care Management professional.
If there is an emergency, Wysa Coach or Wysa Medical Assistant can call you or someone you trust.
We keep a record of any permissions you give us.
We let you know if we change our rules or privacy notice in the app.
Legal grounds: contract performance, legitimate interests and consent.
Use of Conversation data
To provide and manage app and services:
We do the following with your information:
We come up with ideas and create AI programs, stories, and ways to talk for our AI Coach. We only use a little bit of data and make sure it cannot be traced back to you.
We translate your preferred language to English and the other way around. This helps us understand each other and keep chatting with the AI Coach.
We remember the text messages you send and choices you make while using the app.
We figure out if you are feeling happy, sad, or have any problems or questions. This helps us chat with you safely and give you required resources.
We make sure we understand you so our conversations make sense.
We show you safe tools and techniques that can help you.
We make sure any personal details you accidentally share in your messages are removed and cannot be traced back to you.
We look for any medical or emergency words in your messages to help keep you safe.
If we see something that seems like an emergency, we may inform your Institution.
We might use some anonymous chats to help our AI learn better.
Legal basis: contract performance, legitimate interests, and consent. Use of appropriate additional conditions for any sensitive data.
To perform well-being assessments:
We do the following with your responses:
We will ask you about how you feel and your mental well-being from time to time.
We keep an eye out for emergencies and may let your Institution know to provide support.
We guide you to helpful hotlines and support resources if you need them.
We recommend tools, tips, and resources to help you feel better.
Legal basis: contract performance, legitimate interests. Use of appropriate additional conditions for any sensitive data.
To Provide Wysa Coach services:
We do the following with your information:
You can send text messages and have video or audio calls with your Wysa Coach.
We give you information and resources shared by your Wysa Coach.
We share your AI Coach conversation data with your Wysa Coach to help with your care. You can stop this sharing anytime from the app settings.
Some of the messages you send to your Wysa Coach are checked for quality. This helps make the service better and safer.
Legal basis: contract performance, legitimate interests and consent. Use of appropriate additional conditions for any sensitive data.
To provide in-app notifications and reminders:
We will send you alerts if you choose to set reminders and notifications. We will remind you about upcoming service events. We will send appropriate Wysa Coach session reminders.
Legal basis: consent.
For research, analytics, and compliance reporting:
We might remove details that show who you are so that no one can tell the information is about you. We will use this changed information to check how well our app is working and to see if it is safe and useful. Sometimes, we also share this information with regulators to make sure we are following the laws.
Legal basis: legitimate interests, legal obligations.
Use of Correspondence data
To communicate effectively with you:
We do the following with your responses:
We answer your questions, requests, complaints, and other feedback.
We fix any problems with our services.
We send you important service updates.
We keep track of our conversations with you to make sure we are doing a good job and following the rules, and also to help train our team.
Legal basis: contract performance, legitimate interests.
Use of Feedbacks
To improve our app and services:
We do the following with your information:
To invite you to join activities like sharing your thoughts about our product, or helping us test it.
To understand your feedback so we can make our product and services safer and better.
To use your personal details to make sure everyone has a fair chance to join in and that we test our product with the right groups of people.
Legal basis: consent and legitimate interest.
Use of Information from your Institution
To provide and manage app and services:
We do the following for your Institution:
We send you special links or codes so you can use the app.
Sometimes, we check to make sure you are part of your Institution.
We share reports and statistics with your Institution.
If there is ever an emergency, and your  Institution needs to know, we send a message to your Institution to get you more help.
Legal basis: contract performance. Use of appropriate additional conditions for any sensitive data.
Use of app event and device data
To understand app and service usage:
We do the following with your information:
We remove any identifiers from your information before using it to check how well our app works and to make sure they are safe.
We check and record the safety and performance of the app so we can report to your Institution or meet our legal requirements.
We confirm sessions with your Wysa Coach.
We share data that cannot identify you about how you use the app with trusted analytics providers. This helps us make the app and its services better.
We use the Information to create new services, technologies, and products.
Legal basis: contract performance, legitimate interests, legal obligation. Use of appropriate additional conditions for any sensitive data.
For marketing purposes:
We do the following with your information:
Sometimes, we create and run campaigns, send out surveys, and give updates about our programs.
We also use anonymous data to understand how well we are doing, make marketing materials, and benchmark ourselves with others.
Legal basis: legitimate interests, consent.
To ensure availability and security:
We do the following with your information:
To make sure the content on our app works well and you get everything you need.
To keep your information safe from hackers and online threats.
Legal basis: contract performance, legitimate interests.
For fraud prevention:
To prevent fraud or misuse of our services and to secure our systems.
Legal basis: legitimate interests.
Use of Cookie Information
We need to use some necessary cookies to make sure our website and app works properly. Here is a simple guide to the kinds of cookies we might use:
Essential cookies. These are very important and are needed for the website and app to work. They help make sure everything runs smoothly, like when you chat on the app. These cookies do not collect any information about you. We handle these cookies ourselves.
Analytical cookies. We also use these cookies to see how well our website and app is doing. They help us understand what is working and what needs fixing. Sometimes, we use our own cookies for this, and sometimes we use Google Analytics. If you want to know what Google Analytics does with the information, you can visit their website.
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt out from Google’s cookies by downloading the
Google Analytics Opt-out
                                                Browser Add-on
                                                Download Page
. We do not use special Google tools to show you ads or test features on the website and the app. We do not use Google signals, which means we do not collect information about you or what you like.
"Do Not Track" (DNT) is something you can turn on in your web browser to keep your online activities more private. However, even if you turn DNT on, we do not collect those signals today and may not be able to respond to it.
Legal basis: legitimate interests.
Additional processing for Digital Front Door (e-triage) Service
To process Institution provided data:
We do the following
Where applicable, to redirect you to your Institution’s SSO web page when you access the app.
To collect, store and use the Institution provided identifier to provide access to the app and service.
Legal basis: contract performance and as defined by your Institution.
If you have any questions about your use of SSO please contact your Institution directly.
To process your provided data:
We do the following;
To direct you to approved support resources based on your provided information, the language you prefer, the kind of support you need, and how you are feeling. These resources may include the Institution's Employee Assistance Program (EAP), the Wysa apps, and other services provided by your Institution.
To share population-level and aggregated analytics on app and service engagement and use with your Institution. You can delete your data at any time by selecting the “Reset my data” option available within the app.
Legal basis: contract performance and as defined by your Institution.
Additional processing for AI Coach over WhatsApp.
To process your provided Information.
We do the following
To recognize you as a new or existing user on whatsapp.
If needed, we will connect with your Institution's approved systems to handle your information.
To associate users to their provided data to provide uninterrupted services.
Use whatsapp profile name to personalize the communication with you.
To process data for addressing your data rights.
To respond to your inquiries, requests and feedback.
To troubleshoot any issues.
Legal basis: contract performance and legitimate interests.
Note: Your messages on WhatsApp Business are always end-to-end encrypted. According to WhatsApp's
Privacy Policy
, your messages are usually stored on your device(s) and not on WhatsApp's global servers. WhatsApp will keep your messages in encrypted form temporarily while they are being delivered. Once delivered, your messages are deleted from WhatsApp's global servers. You can protect your information on WhatsApp by using its
privacy and security features
. Find out more about WhatsApp’s
end-to-end encryption
and how it keeps
business messages
safe. WhatsApp allows you to send attachments or voice messages, but we do not need them to provide our service. Please avoid sharing such information with us.
Additional processing for Chronic Care Management Service.
To process Institution provided data:
We do the following
For Wysa Medical Assistant to contact you for Chronic Care Management and associated services within the app on behalf of your healthcare provider.
To encourage and support you for medication adherence and for your care.
To summarize and record health notes.
To assist you with appropriate support resources and guidance.
To share your case notes and information with your healthcare provider.
Legal basis: contract performance and as defined by your Institution.
Additional processing during participation in Wysa research study.
To process the information shared by you during participation.
We do the following
To inform about the study purposes.
To understand your eligibility for the study.
To manage your joining process.
To send study related information and reminders.
To contact you during the study for research purposes and respond to requests.
To perform analysis using the information provided.
Legal basis: your consent and legitimate interests.
Note: You can stop participating in the research at any time after it starts. You can do this by changing the settings in the app or sending an email to
wysa@wysa.io
with the subject "opt out of Wysa Study". Once you opt out, we will delete your enrollment data within one year. However, the data you provided while using the app will be kept according to our data retention policy, which you can read about
here
. Your study data will always be kept safe. You can learn more about how we protect your data
here
.
Additional processing when you visit our website or social media accounts or our web pages.
To process your correspondence data:
We do the following
We collect, store, and use business data when you contact us.
We respond and provide support for your questions.
We talk to customers to find new leads, help our business grow, manage accounts, or for marketing purposes.
To monitor, enforce and comply with unsolicited communication laws prior to any marketing and business development reach outs.
Legal basis: your consent and legitimate interests.
To process cookie Information during your visit.
To find out how we manage cookie data, please look at
section 7 ("Use of Cookie Information”)
.
Additional processing during online group well-being sessions.
To process your provided information:
We do the following
We collect, store and use your information to enroll and connect you to the well-being sessions.
To contact you regarding the session and future sessions.
To send session related materials and resources.
Legal basis: your consent, legitimate interests and as defined by your Institution.
Additional processing during campaigns or promotions or marketing events.
To process the promotion event data:
We do the following
To sign you up and get you started on the promotion or campaign.
To contact you about campaigns and promotions.
To send you information about promotions, newsletters, webinar invites, and reminders.
To make sure we follow the rules about not sending unwanted messages before we contact you for marketing or business reasons.
Legal basis: your consent, legitimate interests and as defined by your Institution.
Note: If you want to leave the promotion or campaign, you can email us at
wysa@wysa.io
. We will reply within 3 business days. Your information will stay private.
We use Meta Ads Manager to make ads about our service, to send these ads, and to see how well they are doing. We also group users together for anonymous cohort analysis. We use Google Analytics to see how much people use this service, but no personal data is collected or shared with them.
Additional processing when you apply for a role at Wysa
To process recruitment data:
We do the following
To gather, save, and organize recruitment data from external recruitment sources.
To review your application.
To offer you a job.
To sign a work contract with you.
To run background and reference checks.
To inform you of your application status.
To think about you for other job opportunities.
To make our hiring process better.
Legal basis: your consent and legitimate interest.
Processing for Legitimate Interests
We may need to use your personal information for important reasons. Before doing this, we will always protect your rights and privacy. Here are the reasons we might use your data:
To follow our agreements with your school or Institution.
If the law requires us to use or share it.
For court cases or legal orders.
For law enforcement or national security needs.
To help investigate or stop illegal activities.
To freeze data for legal reasons so that it cannot be changed or deleted.
To report public health information.
To prevent serious risks to health or safety.
To do basic research and understand how people use our services.
To communicate with you about using our app and services.
To fix and protect the app’s security and operations.
To stop fraud or misuse of our service.
To keep your data secure and private.
To make sure the app and services work well and are easy to use.
To protect your fundamental rights, and safety.
To use anonymous data for benchmarking and marketing.
To create new services, technologies, and products.
To answer your questions and requests.
4. How We Protect Your Information
Where is your information stored
The information we collect is saved and kept safe in our cloud servers managed by Amazon Web Services (AWS). Some of your information might be shared and stored with our third-party service providers to provide our services.
How long do we keep your information
When you use our app
When you send us text messages, any personal identifier you share is removed and saved in a way that cannot be undone. We keep this information only for as long as we need to follow the law. If there is no specific time limit mentioned, we keep your information for up to 10 years from the last time you updated it. You can also choose to delete all your conversation data forever by using the 'reset my data' option in the app settings.
Your correspondence data
When you email us, we use the information you give to help you. We keep your emails safe in our Google Workspace account, and only certain staff can look at them. We will keep your email for up to 10 years from the last time you contacted us.
Information received from your Institution
We keep your information for the time your Institution has decided. After that time, we delete your information forever. Once you send us your information, we cannot change it. If you need to fix something or have any questions, please talk to your Institution.
Data Security
We use physical, organizational, and technical safeguards to keep your information safe. Here are some ways we do that:
Protecting your privacy
You do not need to register to use the app.
Just give us a nickname so our chatbot knows what to call you.
We use masked identifiers to keep your data and identity safe.
No real people can listen to what you are talking about with the AI Coach.
The AI Coach will always make sure it understands you before moving on.
If you accidentally share personal data, we will make sure to remove it so no one can see it.
As an app user, you can choose "reset my data" to delete your information.
Before we use any personal data about you, we make sure it respects your rights.
Protecting your security
We use strong encryption to protect your data when it is being sent or stored.
Only authorised people can access your data. They have to use strong passwords and an additional access code.
All our staff computers have extra security.
We maintain contracts with companies we work with to keep your data safe.
We carefully check the background of new staff before hiring them.
We train our staff on how to handle your information securely.
We have experts from outside our company check if we are following the rules every year.
We regularly test our app and systems for any weaknesses.
We fix any problems in our computer code to make sure it is safe.
We often check to make sure we are following our safety plans and rules.
Responsible use of Artificial Intelligence
At Wysa, we use artificial intelligence (AI) programs to understand what you type to us. These programs help us talk with you in a way that makes sense and guides you to helpful information. Our programs follow set rules and do not learn new things on their own. We make sure our AI chatbot is fair, safe, and treats your information with care. If you use the Wysa+ service, we use Generative AI technology to assist you. We have safety measures in place to keep our conversations secure and trustworthy. We also have good practices to monitor and check the use of AI at Wysa, making sure your rights are protected. Please contact us at wysa@wysa.io if you have any more questions about our use of AI.
We do our best to keep your personal data safe, but no method is perfect. We cannot promise complete security. You can help keep your data safe too. Please do not copy and share your chats with people you do not know.
Payment Data
We do not collect, keep, or store your credit card information. Third-party payment companies handle your card processing. We do not get any personal data from app stores after you buy something or from our third-party payment providers. However, we might note the name of the business for our internal purposes. Please read the payment gateway’s terms and privacy policy before you make a payment. We do receive and handle payment confirmations and subscription details. This is to help you with your subscription requests.
Third-Party Sites
The app might have links to other websites or resources. When you click on these links, remember that these other sites have their own rules about privacy. We do not control these other sites and we are not responsible for their privacy rules. It is a good idea to read their privacy rules before you share any personal data on those sites.
Children’s Privacy
The app is intended for anyone who is older than 13 years or where provided by your Institution, follow the age criteria and rules set by your Institution. If you are a child, please ask your parent or guardian to read this policy and the terms of service with you. Wysa does not take responsibility if someone lies about their age to use the app and services.
It is very important for us to protect children's privacy on the app. We do not knowingly collect personal data from children. If you think we have any personal data of your child, please write to us. We will respond within one month after verifying the information. If we cannot identify the user correctly, we might not be able to address your request. However, if we find we have collected personal data from your child, we will deactivate their account and delete the data.
We encourage parents and guardians to watch over their children's internet use. Tell your children not to give out personal information without your permission. You should not share your credit/debit card or other payment methods with your child to make in-app purchases.
Best Practices
We want to help you stay safe online. Here are some important tips to stay secure:
Always lock your mobile screen with a password. Make sure it is strong and do not share it with anyone. Never leave your device alone.
Always update your mobile’s operating system to the latest version.
Turn on remote access on your device so you can find and control it if it gets stolen.
Install anti-virus software to protect your device from viruses.
Be careful with emails. Do not open files, click on links, or download anything from sources you do not know.
Be smart about using Wi-Fi. Before sending personal or important data over a public Wi-Fi in places like a coffee shop or airport, check if the network is safe.
5. Who We Share Information With
Service Providers
We work with third party companies that help us run our app, fix any problems, and offer other important services. These companies might use your personal data to provide services for us. For a list of service providers please read
here
.
Legal
We sometimes need to use your personal data to follow the law. This might mean sharing your information with other people like insurance companies, courts, police, or other important organisations. We might also use your information to stop serious health or safety problems, for public health reports, and to keep information safe during legal situations so it is not changed. Also, we might share your information to help with finding out or stopping fraud or crime. We will make sure your rights and interests are protected.
Reorganization
In situations like when we might sell our business, join up with another company, reorganize, or are facing bankruptcy, we may need to share some of your personal data with others. These third parties will use your information to look at the business deal. After these changes happen, we might also share your information with the new company for the same purposes mentioned in this privacy notice. We will try to let you know by putting a notice on our website, telling your Institution, sending you a notification in the app, or updating this privacy notice.
6. Sharing Information Outside Your Country
Sometimes we need to share, store, and manage your information with our service providers. These service providers might be in countries where data protection is not as strong as it is here. We have agreements with our service provider that include data protection rules to keep your data safe.
We only share the necessary data between our Wysa offices to provide you with the best service. We use strong technology to keep your data safe.
If you have any questions about how we send your data to other countries, you can email us at
wysa@wysa.io
.
7. Your Data Protection Rights
When you trigger “Reset my data” from app settings
The "Reset my Data" feature is found in the app settings of the app. If you use this feature, all your conversation information, including your ID, past chats, reminders, assessment answers, and settings will be deleted from our system. Once you reset, you cannot get back any of your old conversations and you will be treated like a new user. So, think carefully before using this feature.
Your Privacy Rights
What Can You Do About Your Data?
Ask Questions: You can ask us how we are using your personal data.
Get a Copy: You can ask for a copy of the personal data we have about you.
Fix It: If any personal data about you is wrong or missing, you can ask us to fix it.
Delete It: If we do not need your personal data anymore, you can ask us to delete it.
Pause It: While we look into any questions you have, you can ask us to stop using your data.
Change Your Mind: If you had said yes to something before, you can still say no later.
Send It Elsewhere: You can ask us to send your personal data to someone else electronically.
Object: You can tell us not to use your personal data for things we think are important.
No Marketing: If you do not want to get marketing emails, just click ‘unsubscribe’ in the emails.
Be fair: When you use our app, we will not treat you unfairly for using your rights.
No Sale: You can choose to stop your personal data from being sold or shared with others who might want to sell it.
Automated Decisions: Our service uses AI to help you. We do not use AI to know your identity. We always check with you before making key suggestions. We change our conversation anytime you inform us that the AI is not helping. We and our service providers might use AI to make automated decisions or automatically process information if we need to perform our services or to stop fraud, abuse or misuse of our services. By using our services, you consent to let us use AI for this purpose. We might change the automated approach we use in the future.
How to Exercise Your Rights
You do not usually have to pay anything to use your rights. Sometimes, we might need to check if it is really you asking. Contact us using the details at the top of this privacy notice. We will reply within one month if you ask us for something.
If a data breach could seriously affect your rights and freedom, we will let you know as required by data protection laws.
When We Might Say “No”
We might not be able to agree to your request if:
The law says we cannot.
It affects someone else’s privacy.
It could harm you, us, or someone else.
The request is too much or does not make sense.
8. How To Complain
If you have any concerns about our use of your personal data, you can make a complaint to us using the contact details at the top of this privacy policy. We will get back to you about your complaints within 3 working days. Some might take a bit longer to sort out. We will keep you updated until everything is fixed.
If you are still not happy with how things have been sorted out, you can send an email to our grievance officer at
grievance@wysa.io
.
9. Supplementary Privacy Notices
Read supplementary privacy notice for USA states.
10. Changes To This Policy
If we change our Privacy Policy, we will let you know in the app. If you keep using the app after we tell you about the changes, it means you agree with them.
11. Change Log
v6.0.0 | Oct 1, 2024
Additions
Supplementary privacy notices for USA state residents
Data collection and processing for our whatsapp based service, voice-enabled services, multi-lingual services, Chronic Care Management services.
Updates
Overhaul of the Privacy Policy to make it more readable for ages 13 and above.
List of service providers
v5.6.0 | July 23, 2024
Additions
Added Wysa+ Generative AI in the list of Services governed by this privacy policy and the additional Wysa+ Generative AI Privacy Policy.
Updates
Changed the section
“How do we use Generative AI technology?” to “Your use of Wysa+ Generative AI Services.”
This section has also been changed to reflect about the service and to provide links to the additional Wysa+ Generative AI terms of use and privacy policy.
V5.6.0 / July 20, 2024
Additions
Added Wysa+ Generative AI in the list of Services governed by this privacy policy and the additional Wysa+ Generative AI Privacy Policy.
Data collection and processing for our whatsapp based service, voice-enabled services, multi-lingual services, Chronic Care Management services.
Updates
Overhaul of the Privacy Policy to make it more readable for ages 13 and above.
List of service providers
Overhaul of the Privacy Policy to make it more readable for ages 13 and above.
v5.5.0 | Dec 18, 2023
Additions
Included “Validated preventative guided programs” in Wysa’s list of Services for Institutional users.
Wysa emotional well-being professional service is included in Hindi and Spanish language Apps.
Use of 3rd party tools to detect and replace any inadvertent personal identifiers within your text messages for better privacy protection.
Details about user level data sharing with Institutional users and about processing health data as a business associate within
What personal data do we process and handle as a Processor or Sub-processor?
New service provider Turn.io (as a Business Solution Provider for our whatsapp service)
New service provider private AI (to redact inadvertent personal identifiers in text messages)
New section that provides details on
“How do we use Generative AI technology?”
Additional privacy and security messages from USA FTC and the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) about how to protect your information when using digital technologies.
Updates
Updated data protection law definition to include India’s DPDP Act 2023
Capture pronouns as other information processed on behalf of Institutions
The list of Service Providers section to provide clarity on data type, purpose and storage involved in the data processing.
Moved the Cloud Service Provider details in the “How do we share your data with third parties?” to the list of Service Providers section.
Promotional event data and Business (B2B) data details within the “What data do we process after taking your Consent?” section.
Data protection rights to inform our obligation where we require to process rights on behalf of your Institution.
v5.4.0 | June 13, 2023
Additions
Wysa App is designed to offer general mental health advice and support and cannot offer condition specific advice for complex medical conditions
Data processing when user participates and consents to Wysa commissioned controlled and real-world online research studies. Data processing details provided in
“What additional personal data do we process when you participate in the online controlled or real-world studies?”.
Updates
Lawful basis of processing has been updated to reflect the most appropriate that applies to the processing.
We also provide Hindi and Spanish version apps for users in certain geographies.
Event Data processing- to analyse app event data for improving product and service quality.
Made minor grammatical corrections.
In addition to CCPA also updated for CCPA related privacy requirements
Updated the Insights & Involvement data in “What data do we process after taking your Consent?”
v5.3.0 | May 5, 2023
Additions
Wysa does not take responsibility for any misrepresentation of age and use by the user.
Included Institution data processing in
“What personal data do we process and how do we use it?”.
Processing of age-range to identify children entering the system and to safeguard in
“What personal data do we process and how do we use it?”.
Added new processors in
“Other Service Providers”
Salesforce / Pardot
Zendesk
Iterable
6Sense
We may capture the Institution name for operational purposes from payment gateways.
A copy of user data might be retained in our backup for a definite period of time.
Updates
Clearly identify all Services governed by the Privacy policy.
Wysa email ID to
wysa@wysa.io
.
Corrected for grammatical constructs and errors across all sections.
Reworded across all sections to ensure readability for younger audiences.
Safety Plan data processing in
“What personal data do we process and how do we use it?”.
Provided additional information about our NLP/NLU algorithm in
“How does the Artificial Intelligence chatbot work and is it safe to use?”.
Updated data retention section in
“How long do we retain your data including personal data?”.
Additional information to cover for multilingual apps.
Removed two sections “What is Wysa App?” and “Who can use the service?” as already covered in TOS.
Kubit.ai has been discontinued as our data processor.
v5.2.0 | January 18, 2023
Additions
Added a new section on “What data do we process when you use the Wysa Digital Front Door Service?”
Updates
Fix for grammar in “What data do we process after taking your Consent?”
v5.1.0 | December 21, 2022
Updates
Included a para on Right to be Informed and deleted a redundant bullet “required to protect our rights and properties” in the “What are your data protection rights?” section.
Included Cookie Policy to the line “By using our Apps and services, you agree to the collection and use of information in accordance with this privacy policy and
cookie policy
”.
v5.0.0 | December 06, 2022
Additions
New section "What personal data do we process and handle as a Processor or Sub-processor?" to reflect data processing when Wysa is a data processor.
Add details around use of marketing tools in "How do we share your data with third parties?".
New additions, bullet 5 and 6, within "Processing of any of your personal data as per our Legitimate Interests".
Addition of business data processing within "What data do we process after taking your Consent?".
New section to organise details around "International transfer of personal data outside of the country you reside in or are currently located".
Include Hindi as a language in use within the app in select geographies.
Included details on retention of emergency contact information after the end of subscription in “How long do we retain your data including personal data?” Section.
Updates
Reorganisation and reframing of sections to provide clarity, grammatical correctness and improved alignment to our current intent and purposes.
Updates made to “Do Note” Section.
Our Coach or therapist services are provided by global human well-being professionals. Changes made to reflect this across the policy.
Updated paragraph on "Institution version of Wysa App".
Minor updates to the table within "What personal data do we process and how do we use it?".
Update on our use of ads in "What additional personal data do we process when you use our WhatsApp-based business service?".
Replace an archived AWS Security link with the latest, within "How do we share your data with third parties?".
Update, bullets 3, 4 and 14, within "Processing of any of your personal data as per our Legitimate Interests"
Updates to the row on processing of app usage data and promotion data in "What data do we process after taking your Consent?"
Updates made to "How do we secure your data?" section
Update to paragraphs of “Right of Access” and “Right in relation to automated decision-making and profiling” within "What is your data protection rights?"
Group the “withdraw consent”, “breach notification“ and “concerns and complaints” sections within a separate section "Other important information".
Additional information provided within "Do California residents have specific privacy rights?"
v4.1.1 | July 5, 2022
Additions
Addition of Wysa AI coach over WhatsApp to the list of services.
New section “What additional personal data do we process when you use the WhatsApp service?”
Addition of new sub-processor, Meta Ads Manager.
Updates
Updated Twilio services to include Business Service Provider service to integrate Wysa's AI coach with WhatsApp.
Minor grammatical corrections.
v4.1.0 | May 26, 2022
Additions
Include Cloudflare among our service providers
Include Web-based apps along with website cookies in
“What data do we process after taking your Consent?”
Update to Disclosure to other third parties with details on reasonable steps
Separately call out “Processing as per our Legitimate Interests”
Added new definition for AI coach and Special Category data
Updates
Definitions: Service provider and Data Processor are interchangeable terms.
“What personal data do we process and how do we use it?”
updates for clarity and appropriateness.
Integrate wellness information as part of Conversation Data
Conversation data by way of audio-video sessions separately outlined
Included processing related to network data separately
Carved out event data separately
Mention DPA with Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) with every service provider
Update the purpose for Google Workspace and 3rd party payment gateway providers for more clarity.
Remove
hello@wysa.ai
email ID
Update Privacy by Design measures
Updates to point on data stored in databases in the Important Notes section.
Update the Privacy by Design section
Update purpose of processing in “What personal data do we process and how do we use it” section
Updated the “How do we secure your data?” section for certifications  and details
Clear messaging about Wysa human professional well-being service
v4.0.0 | November 10, 2021
Additions
Complete revamp to improve the readability of the Privacy Policy.
Include information about the Audio-Video Service provided by Coach or Therapist.
Introduction of AI Coach modules and tools for Spanish language users.
Included our other applications including Ascension Wysa app in scope of this policy. 
                                    This Privacy Policy replaces the existing Ascension Wysa's privacy policy.
v3.3.1 | July 16, 2021
Removed
Review and remove Suicide helpline link from Important Notice.
v3.3.0 | July 01, 2021
Additions
Included our other applications including Sleep by Wysa App in scope of this policy.
                                    This Privacy Policy replaces the existing Sleep by Wysa's privacy policy. Updated Important
                                    notice for key information about Sleep by Wysa.
Add information on transfer of Your Data to regions other than Your resident country/state in the Important Notice section.
Added section on data processed from candidates applying to Wysa's open job positions.
Added processing of candidates information for current and future employment opportunities as our legitimate interest
Added processing of information when using Wysa's video-based service with the Well-being Coach or Therapist
Added FTC security and privacy guidance in What are some best practices to follow to keep your device secure?
Explicitly added Right to withdraw Consent
Provided details to our UK ICO registration
Updates
Mention about ISO 27001 (ISMS) and ISO 27701 (PIMS) certifications and adhering to GDPR 7 Principles
Minor updates in "What does this Privacy policy apply to?"
Renamed GSuite to Google Workspace
Mention of Wysa Well-being Coach or Wysa Therapist Services provided outside of the Wysa App for Institutional Users
Energy questionnaire included in "How do we handle your responses to screening assessments?"
More clarity about your data transmitted and stored
Payment gateway related updates in how do we handle your payment data?
Updated “Can children under 13 Use Wysa App?” with note of advice to parents and legal guardian.
Removed
FB analytics has been discontinued. Added use of 3rd party analytics provided by Kubit AI 
                                    whose details have been provided in “How do We use any Third Party Analytics tools and softwares?”
v3.2.0 | Apr 16, 2021
Updates
Additional clarity on handling data where Wysa App is integrated with Your Institution system
Additional clarity on use of minimal and anonymous conversation messages for improving performance of Bot algorithms
Additional information around security controls and alignment to ISO 27001: 2013 and ISO 27701: 2019 global standards
Additional clarity on anonymized and minimal data shared with third parties
Removed
Video Call- based experimental Coach/therapist Service has been currently discontinued. Section “What do we process when You use the Video Call Service?” removed
v3.1.0 | Feb 10, 2021
Updates
Additional clarity on the retention of data;
Additional data processed from Institution users in section “What additional data do We collect from Institution Users?”
v3.0.0 | Feb 03, 2021
Overall
An overall review and necessary updates were made to align Privacy Policy to ISO/IEC 27001:2013 (Information Security Management System) and ISO/IEC 27701:2019 (Privacy Information Management System);
Additions
Included “For purposes of servicing You towards Wysa’s Gift Card program” as a Legitimate Interest basis;
Three new subsections added at the end of “What Data do We collect and how do We Use it?”
What do we process when You use the Video Call Service? (experimental service for android users only)
How do We handle Your data when used for Research purposes?
What data do we process as part of Gift Card purchase?
Updates
Included details on use of branch.io and mailgun third party analytics software services;
UK GDPR mentioned as another regulation requirement for this Privacy Policy;
Additional items included in “Definition” Section;
Additional clarity on need for parental consent for those between 13 and 18 years in “Who can use the Service” Section;
Updated link to Wysa Cookie Policy in “Do we use Cookies?” Section;
Additional clarity on the retention of data
Additional clarity on “Do California residents have specific privacy rights?”
Additional clarity on “What are the controls for Do-Not-Track features?”
Additional clarity on changes to privacy policy
Removed
Section “Governing Law and Dispute Resolution” to align with EU GDPR laws
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://legal.wysa.io/wysa-plus/privacy-policy.html:
Wysa+ Privacy Policy
Reference Notices
Data Collection and Use
Data Sharing and Disclosure
Data Transfer and Retention
Your Data Protection rights
Security Measures
Contact Information
Changes to this notice
Use of Wysa+
Use of Generated Insights within Weekly Report
Change Log
Content
Wysa+ Privacy Policy
Reference Notices
Data Collection and Use
Data Sharing and Disclosure
Data Transfer and Retention
Your Data Protection rights
Security Measures
Contact Information
Changes to this notice
Use of Wysa+
Use of Generated Insights within Weekly Report
Change Log
Wysa+ Privacy Policy
Initial Effective Date: April 23, 2024 (GMT)
Latest Revised Date: October 1, 2024 (GMT)
Version: 3.0.0
This notice explains how we handle your data when we use Generative Artificial Intelligence (or "Gen AI") in the Wysa+ service. It is part of our main Wysa Privacy Policy. We use Gen AI to provide new features and content in Wysa+ services. This notice shows how we collect, use, and share your information when you use Wysa+ services. The main Wysa Privacy Policy still covers other uses of your information in the app. The words here mean the same as in the Wysa Privacy Policy and Wysa Terms of Service. You should read this notice together with the
Wysa Privacy Policy
and
Wysa+ Terms of Use
.
We care about keeping your information safe. We follow data protection laws to protect your information, which includes, but is not limited to the Information Technology Act of 2000, the Privacy Rules of 2011, the Digital Personal Data Protection Act of 2023, the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), and the UK's Data Protection Act. When you use our Wysa+ services, you agree that we can use your information as explained here.
Reference Notices
Wysa+ Terms of Use
Wysa Privacy Policy
Wysa Terms of Service
Wysa List of Service Providers
Data Collection and Use
Wysa uses Gen AI with high repeatability and clinical safety, just like its regular AI Coach services. We make sure every Wysa+ service feature is tested many times to be safe and appropriate. Wysa clinicians review the Gen AI to make sure it works well and is safe before you can use it.
Please look at the Use of Wysa+ section to understand why and how we use your information.
Data Sharing and Disclosure
We use third-party Gen AI technologies to give you the Wysa+ services. Before we share your conversation data with these companies, we make sure it passes our safety and security controls. We establish strict organisational and technical security measures with these third-parties. Your conversation data is only kept by these service providers for as long as it is needed.
Data Transfer and Retention
To offer Wysa+ Services, we might need to share your information with our service providers. These providers may be in countries with different data protection laws, which could be less strict than the ones in your country. We take care to follow the necessary laws when sharing your data and make sure your personal information is protected, as described in our
main Privacy Policy
.
We keep your personal and derived information in our and third-party service provider systems only for as long as needed to meet the purposes stated in our Privacy Policy or as required by law. When we no longer need the data, we will delete it safely as explained
here
.
Your Data Protection rights
You still have your data protection rights as explained in the Wysa Privacy Policy. If you have any questions about your data protection rights, you can email us at
wysa@wysa.io
.
Security Measures
We take steps to keep your information safe from being seen, lost, or changed without permission. You can learn more about how we protect your data by visiting
here
.
Here are extra steps we take to keep you safe:
Every message sent to and from Gen AI is encrypted so no one else can read it.
We check each message you send to make sure it does not have personal identifiers. This helps keep your private details safe from being shared with the Gen AI service provider.
We always check what is sent and received from Gen AI to make sure it is safe and good to use.
We also use safety rules to double-check and make sure everything is safe.
We do a special check called Data Protection Impact Assessment (DPIA) to find and fix any risks, making sure our safety checks work well.
Do note:
We cannot promise that things sent or saved on the internet are completely safe.
Contact Information
If you have any questions about this notice or how we use your information, please email us at
wysa@wysa.io
.
Changes to this notice
If we change this notice, we will let you know in the app. If you keep using the service after we tell you, it means you agree with them.
Use of Wysa+
Here is how the data is handled.
Wysa+ is a new and improved version of the AI Coach service. It uses advanced AI technologies to talk to you in a more personal way.
Wysa+ uses Gen AI along with our own AI to chat with you.
Using Gen AI helps Wysa understand what you are saying better. It helps to make the conversations more interesting and useful. This way, Wysa can give you responses that are just right for you.
When you use the app, please read the Wysa Privacy Policy to understand how we use your information. If you use the Wysa+ service, here are some extra things we do with your information:
Conversation data processing:
When you use the Wysa+ service, your text or voice messages or their translations are shared with Gen AI. Use of special instructions called PROMPTS, helps make sure the responses you get are clear, fair and helpful. The PROMPTS include your messages and summaries of your chats or their translations to keep the conversation on track. If you ask for specific tools from Wysa in your messages, the program will label them so Wysa can show you those tools. We also use Gen AI to improve our classification of your messages to better understand and serve you with appropriate resources. If you want to, you can delete all your messages and the responses from our system by clicking "reset my data" in the app settings. Remember, if you do this, you will lose all your messages and summaries forever, and you will not be able to get them back. So, use this feature carefully.
Personal identifier detection:
We look for any personal information that you might have shared by mistake. If there are any, we ask you to change your message before we send it to Gen AI.
Safety Processing:
We have rules to keep your chats safe. When you send a message, it goes through these rules. If your message does not follow the rules we do not send it to Gen AI. When Gen AI sends a message back, it also has to follow the rules. If it does not, we change it to a safer message. This way, all your chats remain safe.
Do Note:
Your device identifiers are not shared with Gen AI. We create a unique identifier that does not reveal who you are. This helps us link what we give to the Gen AI and what the Gen AI gives back to us. This keeps all your data and messages safe.
Gen AI is a new technology, and it has some limitations. Please read the Wysa+ Terms of Use to know more about these limitations.
We handle your personal data for these reasons:
Performance of a contract: We use your data because we need it to give you our services. This is based on the agreement you have with our WysaTerms of Service and the Wysa+ Terms of Use.
Legitimate interests: We use your data for making sure our services are safe, and improving how well they work. We make sure that your rights and freedoms are protected.
Use of Generated Insights within Weekly Report
Where applicable, every week we get you a report within the app. These reports give you personalized and useful information based on how you use the app. This can help you learn more about yourself and improve your mental health and well-being.
Some insights in the Weekly Report are created using Gen AI (short for "Generated Insights"). This is a part of Wysa+ service.
We share only derived and anonymous data with the Gen AI service provider. The data we use each week comes from the information you provide and your choices while using the app. Here is what we collect each week:
Mood Description: This is taken from the smiley face you choose at the start of a session. It tells us if you are feeling not great, mostly low, somewhere in the middle, pretty good, or in high spirits.
Topics and feelings: These are keywords from your conversations with the AI Coach at the beginning of a session. For example, feelings could be sad, calm, confused, happy, numb, confident. Topics could be work or education.
Tools Used: This is the list of Wysa tools you used during your time on the app.
Important Note:
We do not share any of your personal details, including device identifiers with the third-party service provider.
We use your personal data and choices for these purposes:
To find topics and feelings through Wysa’s programs.
To derive mood values from your choices during check-ins.
To record how you use Wysa’s tools.
To prepare an anonymous dataset.
To share this anonymous dataset with the third-party service provider.
To get and store the output received from Gen AI.
To ensure everything is safe, private, and secure through proper precautions.
To create useful insights from the results and add them to the weekly report.
To talk with you, answer your questions, and provide help.
To follow the law and protect your rights and interests.
We handle your personal data for these reasons:
Performance of a contract: We use your data because we need it to give you our services. This is based on the agreement you have with our appTerms of Service and the Wysa+ Terms of Use.
Legitimate interests: We use your data for making sure our services are safe, and improving how well they work. We make sure that your rights and freedoms are protected. Processing of your mood values, topics and feelings is based on the substantial public interest for the provision of advice or support to manage and encourage mental health and well-being in a self-help and self-monitoring context.
Change Log
V3.0.0 | Oct 1, 2024
Additions
Update Wysa+ service data collection and usage.
Updates
All references to “Wysa+ GAI Service/s” are henceforth “Wysa+ service/s”.
Overhaul of the Privacy Policy to make it more readable for ages 13 and above.
Consolidate centrally the list of all Service Providers.
V2.1.1 | July 20, 2024
Updates
All references to “GAI Service/s” are henceforth “Wysa+ GAI Service/s”.
V2.1.0 | June 30, 2024
Additions
The Wysa+ Service now uses Generative AI across most areas of the AI chatbot conversation. Conversations have been made richer by design while safeguarding your messages. Read the Personal data processing section of “Your use of Wysa+” for updates to the Conversation data processing.
V2.0.1 | April 23, 2024
Additions
Processing for Wysa + GAI  Services.
Updates
More clarity on processing and controls provided by Open AI API.
Wysa logo change
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Many websites and apps use Google services to improve their content and keep it free. When they integrate our services, these sites and apps share information with Google.
For example, when you visit a website that uses advertising services like AdSense, including analytics tools like Google Analytics, or embeds video content from YouTube, your web browser automatically sends certain information to Google. This includes the URL of the page you’re visiting and your IP address. We may use the IP address, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also
set cookies on your browser
or read cookies that are already there. Apps that use Google advertising services also share information with Google, such as the name of the app and a unique identifier for advertising.
Google uses the information shared by sites and apps to deliver our services, maintain and improve them, develop new services, measure the effectiveness of advertising, protect against fraud and abuse, and personalize content and ads you see on Google and on our partners’ sites and apps. See our
Privacy Policy
to learn more about how we process data for each of these purposes and our
Advertising
page for more about Google ads, how your information is used in the context of advertising, and how long Google stores this information.
Our
Privacy Policy
explains the legal grounds Google relies upon to process your information — for example, we may process your information with your consent or to pursue legitimate interests such as providing, maintaining and improving our services to meet the needs of our users.
Sometimes, when processing information shared with us by sites and apps, those sites and apps will ask for your consent before allowing Google to process your information. For example, a banner may appear on a site asking for consent for Google to process the information that site collects. When that happens, we will respect the purposes described in the consent you give to the site or app, rather than the legal grounds described in the Google Privacy Policy. If you want to change or withdraw your consent, you should visit the site or app in question to do so.
Ad personalization
If ad personalization is turned on, Google will use your information to make your ads more useful for you. For example, a website that sells mountain bikes might use Google's ad services. After you visit that site, you could see an ad for mountain bikes on a different site that shows ads served by Google.
If ad personalization is off, Google will not collect or use your information to create an ad profile or personalize the ads Google shows to you. You will still see ads, but they may not be as useful. Ads may still be based on the topic of the website or app you're looking at, your current search terms, or on your general location, but not on your interests, search history, or browsing history. Your information can still be used for the other purposes mentioned above, such as to measure the effectiveness of advertising and protect against fraud and abuse.
When you interact with a website or app that uses Google services, you may be asked to choose whether you want to see personalized ads from ad providers, including Google. Regardless of your choice, Google will not personalize the ads you see if your ad personalization setting is off or your account is ineligible for personalized ads.
You can see and control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your
ad settings
.
How you can control the information collected by Google on these sites and apps
Here are some of the ways you can control the information that is shared by your device when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services:
Ad Settings
helps you control ads you see on Google services (such as Google Search or YouTube), or on non-Google websites and apps that use Google ad services. You can also
learn how
ads are personalized, opt out of ad personalization, and block specific advertisers.
If you are signed in to your Google Account, and depending on your Account settings,
My Activity
allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, including the information we collect from the sites and apps you have visited. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Many websites and apps use Google Analytics to understand how visitors engage with their sites or apps. If you don’t want Analytics to be used in your browser, you can
install the Google Analytics browser add-on
. Learn more about
Google Analytics and privacy
.
Incognito mode in Chrome
allows you to browse the web without recording webpages and files in your browser or Account history (unless you choose to sign in). Cookies are deleted after you've closed all of your incognito windows and tabs, and your bookmarks and settings are stored until you delete them. Learn more about
cookies
. Using Incognito mode in Chrome or other private browsing modes does not prevent the collection of data when you visit websites that use Google services, and Google may still collect data when you visit websites using these browsers.
Many browsers, including Chrome, allow you to block third-party cookies. You can also clear any existing cookies from within your browser. Learn more about
managing cookies in Chrome
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 2
https://www.whatsapp.com/legal/privacy-policy/?lang=en:
Skip to content
WhatsApp Privacy Policy
Effective January 4, 2021
archived versions
If you live in the
European Region
, WhatsApp Ireland Limited provides the Services to you under this
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
.
If you live in the
UK
, WhatsApp LLC provides the Services to you under this
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
.
WhatsApp Legal Info
If you live outside the
European Region
or the
UK
, WhatsApp LLC ("WhatsApp," "our," "we," or "us") provides our Services to you under this
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
.
Our Privacy Policy ("Privacy Policy") helps explain our data practices, including the information we process to provide our Services.
For example, our Privacy Policy talks about what information we collect and how this affects you. It also explains the steps we take to protect your privacy, like building our Services so delivered messages aren’t stored by us and giving you control over who you communicate with on our Services.
We are one of the
Meta Companies
. You can learn more further below in this Privacy Policy about the ways in which we share information across this family of companies.
This Privacy Policy applies to all of our Services unless specified otherwise.
Please also read WhatsApp’s
Terms of Service
("Terms"), which describe the terms under which you use and we provide our Services.
Back to top
Key Updates
Respect for your privacy is coded into our DNA. Since we started WhatsApp, we’ve built our services with a set of strong privacy principles in mind. In our updated
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
you’ll find:
Additional Information On How We Handle Your Data
. Our updated Terms and Privacy Policy provide more information on how we process your data, and our commitment to privacy. For example, we’ve added more information about more recent product features and functionalities, how we process your data for safety, security, and integrity, and added more direct links to user settings, Help Center articles and how you can manage your information.
Better Communication With Businesses
. Many businesses rely on WhatsApp to communicate with their customers and clients. We work with businesses that use Meta or third parties to help store and better manage their communications with you on WhatsApp.
Making It Easier To Connect
. As part of the
Meta Companies
, WhatsApp partners with Meta to offer experiences and integrations across Meta’s family of apps and products.
Back to top
Information We Collect
WhatsApp must receive or collect some information to operate, provide, improve, understand, customize, support, and market our Services, including when you install, access, or use our Services.
The types of information we receive and collect depend on how you use our Services. We require certain information to deliver our Services and without this we will not be able to provide our Services to you. For example, you must provide your mobile phone number to create an account to use our Services.
Our Services have optional features which, if used by you, require us to collect additional information to provide such features. You will be notified of such collection, as appropriate. If you choose not to provide the information needed to use a feature, you will be unable to use the feature. For example, you cannot share your location with your contacts if you do not permit us to collect your location data from your device. Permissions can be managed through your Settings menu on both Android and iOS devices.
Information You Provide
Your Account Information
. You must provide your mobile phone number and basic information (including a profile name of your choice) to create a WhatsApp account. If you don’t provide us with this information, you will not be able to create an account to use our Services. You can add other information to your account, such as a profile picture and "about" information.
Your Messages
. We do not retain your messages in the ordinary course of providing our Services to you. Instead, your messages are stored on your device and not typically stored on our servers. Once your messages are delivered, they are deleted from our servers. The following scenarios describe circumstances where we may store your messages in the course of delivering them:
Undelivered Messages
. If a message cannot be delivered immediately (for example, if the recipient is offline), we keep it in encrypted form on our servers for up to 30 days as we try to deliver it. If a message is still undelivered after 30 days, we delete it.
Media Forwarding
. When a user forwards media within a message, we store that media temporarily in encrypted form on our servers to aid in more efficient delivery of additional forwards.
We offer end-to-end encryption for our Services. End-to-end encryption means that your messages are encrypted to protect against us and third parties from reading them. Learn more about
end-to-end encryption
and
how businesses communicate with you on WhatsApp
.
Your Connections
. You can use the contact upload feature and provide us, if permitted by applicable laws, with the phone numbers in your address book on a regular basis, including those of users of our Services and your other contacts. If any of your contacts aren’t yet using our Services, we’ll manage this information for you in a way that ensures those contacts cannot be identified by us. Learn more about our contact upload feature
here
. You can create, join, or get added to groups and broadcast lists, and such groups and lists get associated with your account information. You give your groups a name. You can provide a group profile picture or description.
Status Information
. You may provide us your status if you choose to include one on your account. Learn how to use status on
Android
,
iPhone
, or
KaiOS
.
Transactions And Payments Data
. If you use our payments services, or use our Services meant for purchases or other financial transactions, we process additional information about you, including payment account and transaction information. Payment account and transaction information includes information needed to complete the transaction (for example, information about your payment method, shipping details and transaction amount). If you use our payments services available in your country or territory, our privacy practices are described in the applicable payments privacy policy.
Customer Support And Other Communications
. When you contact us for customer support or otherwise communicate with us, you may provide us with information related to your use of our Services, including copies of your messages, any other information you deem helpful, and how to contact you (e.g., an email address). For example, you may send us an email with information relating to app performance or other issues.
Automatically Collected Information
Usage And Log Information
. We collect information about your activity on our Services, like service-related, diagnostic, and performance information. This includes information about your activity (including how you use our Services, your Services settings, how you interact with others using our Services (including when you interact with a business), and the time, frequency, and duration of your activities and interactions), log files, and diagnostic, crash, website, and performance logs and reports. This also includes information about when you registered to use our Services; the features you use like our messaging, calling, Status, groups (including group name, group picture, group description), payments or business features; profile photo, "about" information; whether you are online, when you last used our Services (your "last seen"); and when you last updated your "about" information.
Device And Connection Information
. We collect device and connection-specific information when you install, access, or use our Services. This includes information such as hardware model, operating system information, battery level, signal strength, app version, browser information, mobile network, connection information (including phone number, mobile operator or ISP), language and time zone, IP address, device operations information, and identifiers (including identifiers unique to
Meta Company Products
associated with the same device or account).
Location Information
. We collect and use precise location information from your device with your permission when you choose to use
location-related features
, like when you decide to share your location with your contacts or view locations nearby or locations others have shared with you. There are certain settings relating to location-related information which you can find in your device settings or the in-app settings, such as location sharing. Even if you do not use our location-related features, we use IP addresses and other information like phone number area codes to estimate your general location (e.g., city and country). We also use your location information for diagnostics and troubleshooting purposes.
Cookies
. We use cookies to operate and provide our Services, including to provide our Services that are web-based, improve your experiences, understand how our Services are being used, and customize them. For example, we use cookies to provide our Services for web and desktop and other web-based services. We may also use cookies to understand which of our Help Center articles are most popular and to show you relevant content related to our Services. Additionally, we may use cookies to remember your choices, like your language preferences, to provide a safer experience, and otherwise to customize our Services for you.
Learn more
about how we use cookies to provide you our Services.
Back to top
Third-Party Information
Information Others Provide About You
. We receive information about you from other users. For example, when other users you know use our Services, they may provide your phone number, name, and other information (like information from their mobile address book) just as you may provide theirs. They may also send you messages, send messages to groups to which you belong, or call you. We require each of these users to have lawful rights to collect, use, and share your information before providing any information to us.
You should keep in mind that in general any user can capture screenshots of your chats or messages or make recordings of your calls with them and send them to WhatsApp or anyone else, or post them on another platform.
User Reports
. Just as you can report other users, other users or third parties may also choose to report to us your interactions and your messages with them or others on our Services; for example, to report possible violations of our Terms or policies. When a report is made, we collect information on both the reporting user and reported user. To find out more about what happens when a user report is made, please see
Advanced Safety and Security Features
.
Businesses On WhatsApp
. Businesses you interact with using our Services may provide us with information about their interactions with you. We require each of these businesses to act in accordance with applicable law when providing any information to us.
When you message with a business on WhatsApp, keep in mind that the content you share may be visible to several people in that business. In addition, some businesses might be working with third-party service providers (which may include Meta) to help manage their communications with their customers. For example, a business may give such third-party service provider access to its communications to send, store, read, manage, or otherwise process them for the business. To understand how a business processes your information, including how it might share your information with third parties or Meta, you should review that business’ privacy policy or contact the business directly.
Third-Party Service Providers
. We work with third-party service providers and other
Meta Companies
to help us operate, provide, improve, understand, customize, support, and market our Services. For example, we work with them to distribute our apps; provide our technical and physical infrastructure, delivery, and other systems; provide engineering support, cybersecurity support, and operational support; supply location, map, and places information; process payments; help us understand how people use our Services; market our Services; help you connect with businesses using our Services; conduct surveys and research for us; ensure safety, security, and integrity; and help with customer service. These companies may provide us with information about you in certain circumstances; for example, app stores may provide us with reports to help us diagnose and fix service issues.
The "
How We Work With Other Meta Companies
" section below provides more information about how WhatsApp collects and shares information with the other
Meta Companies
.
Third-Party Services
. We allow you to use our Services in connection with third-party services and
Meta Company Products
. If you use our Services with such third-party services or
Meta Company Products
, we may receive information about you from them; for example, if you use the WhatsApp share button on a news service to share a news article with your WhatsApp contacts, groups, or broadcast lists on our Services, or if you choose to access our Services through a mobile carrier’s or device provider’s promotion of our Services. Please note that when you use third-party services or
Meta Company Products
, their own terms and privacy policies will govern your use of those services and products.
Back to top
How We Use Information
We use information we have (subject to choices you make and applicable law) to operate, provide, improve, understand, customize, support, and market our Services. Here's how:
Our Services
. We use information we have to operate and provide our Services, including providing customer support; completing purchases or transactions; improving, fixing, and customizing our Services; and connecting our Services with
Meta Company Products
that you may use. We also use information we have to understand how people use our Services; evaluate and improve our Services; research, develop, and test new services and features; and conduct troubleshooting activities. We also use your information to respond to you when you contact us.
Safety, Security, And Integrity
. Safety, security, and integrity are an integral part of our Services. We use information we have to verify accounts and activity; combat harmful conduct; protect users against bad experiences and spam; and promote safety, security, and integrity on and off our Services, such as by investigating suspicious activity or violations of our Terms and policies, and to ensure our Services are being used legally. Please see the
Law, Our Rights and Protection
section below for more information.
Communications About Our Services And
The Meta Companies
. We use information we have to communicate with you about our Services and let you know about our terms, policies, and other important updates. We may provide you marketing for our Services and those of the
Meta Companies
.
No Third-Party Banner Ads
. We still do not allow third-party banner ads on our Services. We have no intention to introduce them, but if we ever do, we will update this Privacy Policy.
Business Interactions
. We enable you and third parties, like businesses, to communicate and interact with each other using our Services, such as
Catalogs
for businesses on WhatsApp through which you can browse products and services and place orders. Businesses may send you transaction, appointment, and shipping notifications; product and service updates; and marketing. For example, you may receive flight status information for upcoming travel, a receipt for something you purchased, or a notification when a delivery will be made. Messages you receive from a business could include an offer for something that might interest you. We do not want you to have a spammy experience; as with all of your messages, you can manage these communications, and we will honor the choices you make.
Back to top
Information You And We Share
You share your information as you use and communicate through our Services, and we share your information to help us operate, provide, improve, understand, customize, support, and market our Services.
Send Your Information To Those With Whom You Choose To Communicate
. You share your information (including messages) as you use and communicate through our Services.
Information Associated With Your Account
. Your phone number, profile name and photo, "about" information, last seen information, and message receipts are available to anyone who uses our Services, although you can configure your Services settings to manage certain information available to other users, including businesses, with whom you communicate.
Your Contacts And Others
. Users, including businesses, with whom you communicate can store or reshare your information (including your phone number or messages) with others on and off our Services. You can use your Services settings and the “block” feature in our Services to manage who you communicate with on our Services and certain information you share.
Businesses On WhatsApp
. We offer specific services to businesses such as providing them with metrics regarding their use of our Services.
Third-Party Service Providers
. We work with third-party service providers and other
Meta Companies
to help us operate, provide, improve, understand, customize, support, and market our Services. We work with these companies to support our Services, such as to provide technical infrastructure, delivery and other systems; market our Services; conduct surveys and research for us; protect the safety, security, and integrity of users and others; and assist with customer service. When we share information with third-party service providers and other
Meta Companies
in this capacity, we require them to use your information on our behalf in accordance with our instructions and terms.
Third-Party Services
. When you or others use third-party services or other
Meta Company Products
that are integrated with our Services, those third-party services may receive information about what you or others share with them. For example, if you use a data backup service integrated with our Services (like iCloud or Google Account), they will receive information you share with them, such as your WhatsApp messages. If you interact with a third-party service or another
Meta Company Product
linked through our Services, such as when you use the in-app player to play content from a third-party platform, information about you, like your IP address and the fact that you are a WhatsApp user, may be provided to such third party or
Meta Company Product
. Please note that when you use third-party services or other
Meta Company Products
, their own terms and privacy policies will govern your use of those services and products.
Back to top
How We Work With Other Meta Companies
As part of the
Meta Companies
, WhatsApp receives information from, and shares information (see
here
) with, the other
Meta Companies
. We may use the information we receive from them, and they may use the information we share with them, to help operate, provide, improve, understand, customize, support, and market our Services and their offerings, including the
Meta Company Products
. This includes:
helping improve infrastructure and delivery systems;
understanding how our Services or theirs are used;
promoting safety, security, and integrity across the
Meta Company Products
, e.g., securing systems and fighting spam, threats, abuse, or infringement activities;
improving their services and your experiences using them, such as making suggestions for you (for example, of friends or group connections, or of interesting content), personalizing features and content, helping you complete purchases and transactions, and showing relevant offers and ads across the
Meta Company Products
; and
providing integrations which enable you to connect your WhatsApp experiences with other
Meta Company Products
. For example, allowing you to connect your Facebook Pay account to pay for things on WhatsApp or enabling you to chat with your friends on other
Meta Company Products
, such as Portal, by connecting your WhatsApp account.
Learn more about the other
Meta Companies
and their privacy practices by reviewing their privacy policies.
Back to top
Assignment, Change Of Control, And Transfer
In the event that we are involved in a merger, acquisition, restructuring, bankruptcy, or sale of all or some of our assets, we will share your information with the successor entities or new owners in connection with the transaction in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
Back to top
Managing And Retaining Your Information
You can access or port your information using our in-app Request Account Info feature (available under Settings > Account). For iPhone users, you can learn how to
access
,
manage
, and
delete
your information through our
iPhone Help Center articles
. For Android users, you can learn how to
access
,
manage
, and
delete
your information through our
Android Help Center articles
.
We store information for as long as necessary for the purposes identified in this Privacy Policy, including to provide our Services or for other legitimate purposes, such as complying with legal obligations, enforcing and preventing violations of our Terms, or protecting or defending our rights, property, and users. The storage periods are determined on a case-by-case basis that depends on factors like the nature of the information, why it is collected and processed, relevant legal or operational retention needs, and legal obligations.
If you would like to further manage, change, limit, or delete your information, you can do that through the following tools:
Services Settings
. You can change your Services settings to manage certain information available to other users. You can manage your contacts, groups, and broadcast lists, or use our “block” feature to manage the users with whom you communicate.
Changing Your Mobile Phone Number, Profile Name And Picture, And “About” Information
. If you change your mobile phone number, you must update it using our in-app change number feature and transfer your account to your new mobile phone number. You can also change your profile name, profile picture, and "about" information at any time.
Deleting Your WhatsApp Account
. You can delete your WhatsApp account at any time (including if you want to revoke your consent to our use of your information pursuant to applicable law) using our in-app delete my account feature. When you delete your WhatsApp account, your undelivered messages are deleted from our servers as well as any of your other information we no longer need to operate and provide our Services. Deleting your account will, for example, delete your account info and profile photo, delete you from all WhatsApp groups, and delete your WhatsApp message history. Be mindful that if you only delete WhatsApp from your device without using our in-app delete my account feature, your information will be stored with us for a longer period. Please remember that when you delete your account, it does not affect your information related to the groups you created or the information other users have relating to you, such as their copy of the messages you sent them.
You can learn more
here
about our data deletion and retention practices and about how to delete your account.
Back to top
Law, Our Rights, And Protection
We access, preserve, and share your information described in the "
Information We Collect
" section of this Privacy Policy above if we have a good-faith belief that it is necessary to: (a) respond pursuant to applicable law or regulations, legal process, or government requests; (b) enforce our Terms and any other applicable terms and policies, including for investigations of potential violations; (c) detect, investigate, prevent, or address fraud and other illegal activity or security, and technical issues; or (d) protect the rights, property, and safety of our users, WhatsApp, the other
Meta Companies
, or others, including to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Back to top
Our Global Operations
WhatsApp shares information globally, both internally within the
Meta Companies
and externally with our partners and service providers, and with those with whom you communicate around the world, in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Your information may, for example, be transferred or transmitted to, or stored and processed in, the United States; countries or territories where the
Meta Companies’
affiliates and partners, or our service providers are located; or any other country or territory globally where our Services are provided outside of where you live for the purposes as described in this Privacy Policy. WhatsApp uses Meta’s global infrastructure and data centers, including in the United States. These transfers are necessary to provide the global Services set forth in our Terms. Please keep in mind that the countries or territories to which your information is transferred may have different privacy laws and protections than what you have in your home country or territory.
Back to top
Updates To Our Policy
We may amend or update our Privacy Policy. We will provide you notice of amendments to this Privacy Policy, as appropriate, and update the “Effective Date” at the top of this Privacy Policy. Please review our Privacy Policy from time to time.
Back to top
Contact Us
If you have questions or issues about our Privacy Policy, please
contact us
.
WhatsApp LLC
Privacy Policy
1601 Willow Road
Menlo Park, California 94025
United States of America
Back to top
Sub-policy 3
https://www.whatsapp.com/security:
...
Select your language
čeština
Deutsch
English
español
français
italiano
magyar
Nederlands
polski
Português (Portugal)
română
slovenčina
slovenščina
svenska
čeština
Deutsch
English
español
français
italiano
magyar
Nederlands
polski
Português (Portugal)
română
slovenčina
slovenščina
svenska
...
Accept cookies from WhatsApp on this browser?
We use cookies to understand, secure, operate, and provide our services.
Learn more about uses and controls in our
Cookie Policy
.
MANAGE COOKIES
ACCEPT
...
Select your language
čeština
Deutsch
English
español
français
italiano
magyar
Nederlands
polski
Português (Portugal)
română
slovenčina
slovenščina
svenska
čeština
Deutsch
English
español
français
italiano
magyar
Nederlands
polski
Português (Portugal)
română
slovenčina
slovenščina
svenska
...
Controlling Cookies with Browser Settings
Your browser or device may offer settings that allow you to choose whether browser cookies are set and to delete them.
These controls vary by browser, and manufacturers may change both the settings they make available and how they work at any time.
Additional information about the controls offered by popular browsers can be found at the links below.
Certain parts of WhatsApp Products may not work properly if you have disabled browser cookies.
Google Chrome
Internet Explorer
Firefox
Safari
Safari Mobile
Opera
AGREE
Skip to content
Secure
by design
To keep you safe, we've designed a messaging and calling experience with world-class security, built innovative tools to put you in control, and we’re there to support you when you need it.
Built-in layers of security give you the
peace of mind
to focus on connecting with family and friends.
Default privacy
No one can search for your phone number or read your personal messages.
Automatic
spam detection
We catch and remove most spam and scam accounts before they can even reach you or before anyone reports them.
Proactive
security alerts
We prompt you to verify your identity if we detect any suspicious or unauthorized attempts to take over your account.
Take
control
of your experience
Check out these easy steps that will add additional layers of protection to prevent hackers and scammers from stealing your account and data.
Enable two-step verification
Set up a secret pin and never share it with anyone to prevent someone from stealing your account.
Learn more
Always use the official WhatsApp
Using fake versions of WhatsApp poses serious privacy and security risks to your account and data.
Learn more
Keep your groups safe
Control who can add you to groups and who can join your groups, and remove members or messages when needed.
Learn more
Learn to spot scams
Get to know common scams and actions you can take to protect yourself and your loved ones.
Learn more
We anticipate and adapt to new risks and provide you with
tools to support you
when you need it.
Report
problematic behavior
Reporting messages, people or businesses helps us keep WhatsApp safe for everyone. Don’t worry, we won’t tell the sender.
Learn more
Block
unwanted contact
If someone you don’t want to chat with is messaging you, simply block them and we’ll make sure you no longer receive their messages or calls.
Learn more
Recover
your account
If you’ve lost access to your account, re-register your phone number. Past conversations are safe on your phone and cannot be read by any one trying to access your account.
Learn more
Need more help?
See all FAQs
How do I stay safe on WhatsApp?
How do I use WhatsApp responsibly?
How do I protect my WhatsApp account?
How does WhatsApp tackle misinformation?
How does WhatsApp prevent abuse during elections?
How do I know if I’m chatting with a business account on WhatsApp?
See all FAQs
Discover
more features
Message
privately
Learn more
Stay
connected
Learn more
Express
yourself
Learn more
WhatsApp
business
Learn more
Sub-policy 4
https://legal.wysa.io/supplementary-privacy-notice:
For California Residents
For Virginia, Connecticut, Colorado, Utah, and Nevada residents
Wysa Supplementary Privacy Notice for USA State Privacy Laws.
Initial Effective Date: June 30, 2017 (GMT)
Latest Revised Date: October 1, 2024 (GMT)
This notice adds to the Wysa Privacy Policy and is for users living in USA states that have enacted state-specific privacy laws.
If you have any questions, complaints, or requests about our privacy notices, you can contact us at
wysa@wysa.io
. We will get back to you within 45 days after we confirm who you are. Sometimes, we might not be able to help if we cannot verify your identity correctly or if there are certain exceptions that apply.
Content
For California Residents
For Virginia, Connecticut, Colorado, Utah, and Nevada residents
For California Residents
Some information is not covered by California's Consumer Privacy Laws (CCPA) and the California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA). This is done to avoid conflicts with other laws that manage these types of information. These excluded types of information include:
Protected health information (covered by HIPAA).
Medical information (covered by California's CMIA).
Clinical trial data.
Public information from government records.
De-identified or aggregated user data that cannot be linked to you.
Here is a list of personal information types that we might have collected from you in the last twelve months:
Identifiers:
These include things like your Android or Apple ID, nickname, or any other identifiers you shared with us.
Conversation Data:
This includes any remaining identifiers left in your text messages after we've tried to remove them. This includes any identifiers you might share while creating or maintaining a safety plan.
Correspondence Data:
This includes your name and email address when you write to us.
																		Device Data: This includes your IP address or information about how you interact with our website or apps.
Recruitment Data:
This includes the name of your current or past company, your employment dates, and any information you provide in a job application.
Promotion Data:
This includes your email address when you sign up for an event.
App Event Data:
This includes insights and reports about your preferences, habits, and behaviors based on the other data we've collected.
Business Data:
This includes your name, email address, and contact information used for business purposes like lead generation, business development, account management, and marketing.
We collect your personal information in different ways, like when you use our app and services, visit our website, or contact us on social networks. Sometimes, we get information from your Institution if needed to help you use our services. We use this information as explained in our Privacy Policy.
In the last twelve months before our Privacy Policy was updated, we might have shared your personal information with our service providers, Wysa affiliates, and related companies. We keep the information you give us when using the app according to our retention policy in the Privacy Policy. Information from research studies is always kept safe. You can read more about how we protect your information in our Privacy Policy.
Wysa generally does not sell your data to third-parties. You can ask us about the information we have shared and use your data protection rights. You have the right to request data deletion, opt-out of "sales," and not be treated unfairly for using your rights.
Do-Not-Track
"Do Not Track" (or "DNT") is a setting you can choose in some web browsers to protect your privacy. We do not pay attention to DNT signals sent by web browsers.
Right to non-discrimination
When you use the App, we do not ask for any personal information. You can stay as anonymous as you want. We have safety measures in place to collect as little personal data as possible. We will never treat you unfairly or ignore your data protection rights.
Right to opt-out of sale
You can choose to keep your personal data from being sold or shared with others. Following the CCPA (CPRA) and other data protection laws, we do not sell any personal data. We also do not know of any instances where the personal data of children under 16 years old has been sold.
For Virginia, Connecticut, Colorado, Utah, and Nevada residents
These laws are the Virginia Consumer Data Privacy Act (VCDPA), the Connecticut Data Privacy Act (CTDPA), the Utah Consumer Privacy Act (UCPA), the Colorado Privacy Act (CPA), and the Nevada Privacy Law (NPL). This section adds extra information to our Privacy Policy to follow these laws.
Collection, Use, Disclosure and rights over Personal Information are as outlined in section 2, 3, 5 and 7 of our main
privacy policy
.
People who live in Colorado, Connecticut, Virginia, and Utah can choose not to have targeted ads shown to them or have their information sold. We do not issue targeted ads through our app and services. If you have any questions you can write to us at the contact provided earlier.
If you live in Colorado, Connecticut, or Virginia, you can also choose not to be a part of profiling that could affect important decisions about you. Even though you can make this request, Wysa does not use profiling in this way right now.
In Nevada, people have a right to stop their personal information from being sold. However, we want you to know that we do not need to follow this rule because we do not sell your personal information for money.
If you have any questions please contact us at
wysa@wysa.io
.